New York, session 2025-2026, S3507.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 225 of the public health law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 5-e to read as follows: 3 5-e. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (r) of subdivision 4 five of this section, the sanitary code shall provide that each nursing 5 home and assisted living facility licensed by the department shall 6 provide and maintain on-site automated external defibrillator (AED) 7 equipment, as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision one of section 8 three thousand-b of this chapter, in quantities and types deemed by the 9 commissioner to be adequate to ensure ready and appropriate access for 10 use during emergencies. Such nursing home and assisted living facilities 11 and staff shall be subject to the requirements and limitations of 12 section three thousand-b of this chapter. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07866-01-5